Utah statutes.
78B-5-801.   Public and private statutes defined.

Statutes are public and private.  A private statute is one which concerns only certain designated individuals, and affects only their private rights.  All other statutes are public, in which are included statutes creating or affecting corporations.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

